Illinois, session 104th, HB3571.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Community-Based Organization TRUST Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Citizenship or immigration status" means all matters 8regarding citizenship of the United States or any other 9country or the authority to reside in or otherwise be present 10in the United States. 11    "Community-based organization" means a private 12not-for-profit organization that is located in a community in 13this State and that provides services to citizens in that 14community and the surrounding area. 15    "Contact information" means home address, work address, 16telephone number, electronic mail address, social media 17information, or any other personal identifying information 18that could be used as a means to contact an individual. 19    "Immigration agent" means an agent of federal Immigration 20and Customs Enforcement, federal Customs and Border 21Protection, or any similar or successor agency. 22    Section 10. Prohibition on providing information to   HB3571- 2 -LRB104 09916 SPS 19986 b1immigration agents. Unless presented with a federal criminal 2warrant, or otherwise required by federal law, a 3community-based organization that receives grants or any other 4appropriation from this State shall not provide contact 5information or information concerning citizenship or 6immigration status in response to any immigration agent's 7inquiry or request for information regarding any individual. 8    Section 15. Enforcement. The Attorney General shall 9enforce the provisions of this Act. In order to ensure 10compliance with this Act, the Attorney General may maintain an 11action for declaratory, injunctive, or any other equitable 12relief in circuit court against any community-based 13organization that violates any provision of this Act. 14    Section 20. Rulemaking. The Attorney General may adopt 15rules to administer and enforce this Act. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.